California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 submission of all administrative claiming plans, training of local educational agency staff, overseeing the local educational agency time survey process, and the submission of detailed quarterly invoices on behalf of any participating local educational agency.

(2) Each participating local educational consortium shall ensure local educational agency compliance with all requirements of the Administrative Claiming process established for local governmental agencies.

(3) Ninety days prior to the initial participation in the Administrative Claiming process, each local educational consortium shall notify the department of its intent to participate in the process, and shall identify each local educational agency that will be participating as its subcontractor.

(r) (1) Each local educational agency that elects to participate in the Administrative Claiming process shall submit claims through its local educational consortium or through the local governmental agency, but not both.

(2) Each local educational agency participating as a subcontractor to a local educational consortium shall comply with all requirements of the Administrative Claiming process established for local governmental agencies.

(s) A participating local governmental agency or a local educational consortium may charge an administrative fee to any entity claiming Administrative Claiming through that agency.

(t) The department
 shall continue to administer the Administrative Claiming process in conformity with federal requirements.

(u) The department shall provide technical assistance to all participating local governmental agencies and local educational consortia in order to maximize federal financial participation in the Administrative Claiming process.

(v) This section shall be applicable to Administrative Claiming process activities performed, and to moneys paid to participating local governmental agencies for those activities in the 1994–95 fiscal year and thereafter, and to local educational consortia in the 1998–99 fiscal year and thereafter.

(w) Nothing in this section or Section 14132.44 shall be construed to prevent any state agency
 from participating in the Administrative Claiming process or from contracting with others to engage in these activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 306, Sec. 1.   (AB 1233)   Effective September 9, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.48.

Targeted case management services to which Sections 14132.44 and 14132.47 does not apply, and as specified in Section 1915(g) of the federal Social Security Act, as amended by Public Law 99-272 (42 U.S.C. Section 1396n(g)), shall be covered as a benefit under this chapter, subject to utilization controls, for the following populations:

(a) Persons served by regional centers administered by the State Department of Developmental Services.

(b) Persons served in other programs administered by the State Department of Developmental Services.

(c) Persons receiving services pursuant to Section 14021.3.

(d) Persons in programs determined appropriate by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 147, Sec. 27.   Effective July 11, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.49.

(a) Upon federal approval of the state plan amendments made pursuant to Section 14021.7 for federal financial assistance, targeted case management, pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 1396n of Title 42 of the United States Code, is covered as a benefit, subject to the availability of funding through the budget process, and subject to utilization controls, for pregnant and parenting adolescents and their children.

(b) In administering subdivision (a), the department shall
 limit the targeted case management benefit to the amount of General Fund or other public moneys, and federal matching funds made available in the Budget Act or other legislation.

(c) The department may redirect General Fund moneys for local assistance for existing adolescent family life programs to the extent necessary to provide state matching funds for implementation of subdivision (a). The amount which may be redirected shall not exceed the amount appropriated for local assistance for the Adolescent Family Life Program.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the additional federal matching funds made available by implementation of subdivision (a) be used to expand the Adolescent Family Life Program and not supplant General Fund or other public moneys or federal funds provided for pursuant to Titles V and XIX of the federal Social Security Act (Sec. 701 and following, and
 Sec. 1396 and following, respectively, of Title 42 of the United States Code).

(e) Determinations to continue, expand, or terminate the program shall be based on all of the following:

(1) The department’s assessment of the effect of Medi-Cal funding for services on the effectiveness of the Adolescent Family Life Program.

(2) A determination of the amount of federal funds received for this service.

(3) An assessment of the cost-effectiveness of the services to the General Fund.

(4) An estimate of the amount of federal funds that could be received by expanding the project to all adolescent family programs statewide.

(f) The
 department shall submit, not later than June 30, 1993, amendments to the state plan required to implement the amendments made to this section during the 1992 portion of the 1991–92 Regular Session for approval by the Secretary of Health and Human Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 123, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.55.

For the purposes of reimbursement under the Medi-Cal program, a speech pathologist or audiologist shall be licensed by the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board or similarly licensed by a comparable agency in the state in which they practice. Licensed speech-language pathologists or licensed audiologists are authorized to utilize and shall be reimbursed for the services of those personnel in the process of completing requirements under the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 2532.2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 47.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.56.

(a) (1) Only to the extent required by the federal government and effective no sooner than required by the federal government, behavioral health treatment (BHT) shall be a covered Medi-Cal service for individuals under 21 years of age.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that, to the extent the federal government requires BHT to be a covered Medi-Cal service, the department shall seek statutory authority to implement this new benefit in Medi-Cal.

(3) For purposes of this section, “behavioral health treatment” or “BHT” means professional services and treatment programs, including applied behavior analysis (ABA) and evidence-based intervention programs, that develop or
 restore, to the maximum extent practicable, the functioning of an individual with pervasive developmental disorder or autism, and are administered by the department as described in the approved state plan.

(b) The department shall implement, or continue to implement, this section only after all of the following occurs or has occurred:

(1) The department receives all necessary federal approvals to obtain federal funds for the service.

(2) The department seeks an appropriation that would provide the necessary state funding estimated to be required for the applicable fiscal year.

(3) The department consults with stakeholders.

(c) The department shall develop and define eligibility criteria,
 provider participation criteria, utilization controls, and delivery system structure for services under this section, subject to limitations allowable under federal law, in consultation with stakeholders.

(d) (1) The department, commencing on the effective date of the act that added this subdivision until March 31, 2017, inclusive, may make available to individuals described in paragraph (2) contracted services to assist those individuals with health insurance enrollment, without regard to whether federal funds are available for the contracted services.

(2) The contracted services described in paragraph (1) may be provided only to an individual under 21 years of age whom the department identifies as no longer eligible for Medi-Cal solely due to the transition of BHT coverage from the waiver program under Section 1915(c) of the federal Social Security Act to
 the Medi-Cal state plan in accordance with this section and who meets all of the following criteria:

(A) They were enrolled in the home and community-based services waiver for persons with developmental disabilities under Section 1915(c) of the Social Security Act as of January 31, 2016.

(B) They were deemed to be institutionalized in order to establish eligibility under the terms of the waiver.

(C) They have not been found eligible under any other federally funded Medi-Cal criteria without a spend down of excess income.

(D) They
 have received a BHT service from a regional center for persons with developmental disabilities as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4620) of Division 4.5.

(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until regulations are adopted. The department shall adopt regulations by July 1, 2017, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, beginning six months after the effective date of this section, the department shall provide semiannual status reports to the Legislature,
 in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, until regulations have been adopted.

(f) For the purposes of implementing this section, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts on a bid or negotiated basis, including contracts for the purpose of obtaining subject matter expertise or other technical assistance. Contracts may be statewide or on a more limited geographic basis. Contracts entered into or amended under this subdivision shall be exempt from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of the Government Code, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(g) The department may seek approval of any necessary state plan amendments or
 waivers to implement this section. The department shall make any state plan amendments or waiver requests public at least 30 days prior to submitting to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, and the department shall work with stakeholders to address the public comments in the state plan amendment or waiver request.

(h) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 145.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.57.

(a) (1) The department shall seek all necessary federal approvals to exercise the option described in Section 1396w-6 of Title 42 of the United States Code, to provide qualifying community-based mobile crisis intervention services to eligible Medi-Cal beneficiaries experiencing a mental health or substance use disorder crisis.

(2) Qualifying community-based mobile crisis intervention services shall be available to eligible Medi-Cal beneficiaries exclusively through a Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system.

(b) The department shall comply with any federal requirements and conditions for receipt of the increased federal medical assistance percentage
 described in Section 1396w-6(c) of Title 42 of the United States Code and any associated federal regulations or guidance for qualifying community-based mobile crisis intervention services.

(c) Subject to obtaining the federal approvals described in subdivision (a), the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Establish requirements for the receipt of qualifying community-based mobile crisis intervention services by eligible Medi-Cal beneficiaries experiencing a mental health or substance use disorder crisis, including, but not limited to, utilization controls.

(2) Establish requirements for authorized providers of qualifying community-based mobile crisis intervention services.

(3) Oversee and enforce the requirements and guidelines developed
 pursuant to this section.

(d) For the purposes of implementing this section, including, but not limited to, providing training and technical assistance, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(e) Subject to federal approval, this section shall be implemented no sooner than January, 1, 2023, and shall be implemented up to the end of the five-year period
 specified in Section 1396w-6 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(f) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals have been obtained and federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(g) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. To the extent practicable, the department shall consult with interested stakeholders when issuing guidance pursuant to this subdivision.

(h) For purposes of this section, the following
 definitions apply:

(1) “Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (i) of Section 14184.101.

(2) “Qualifying community-based mobile crisis intervention services” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 1396w-6(b) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 97.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.58.

(a) The department shall file all necessary state plan amendments, as set forth in Section 457.40 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, to exercise the health services initiative (HSI) option made available under the Children’s Health Insurance Program (CHIP), established under Title XXI of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa et seq.), as that option is described in Section 1397ee(a)(1)(D)(ii) of Title 42 of the United States Code, and as HSI is defined in Section 457.10 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, to cover vision services provided to low-income children statewide through a mobile optometric office, as defined in Section 3070.2 of the Business and Professions Code and in accordance with subdivision (g) of Section 14043.15 and with Section 14043.26.

(b) (1) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available. The federal financial participation shall be limited to no more than 3 percent of the total federal dollars available for expenditures not used for Medicaid or health insurance assistance, as described in Section 1397ee(c)(2)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) This section shall be implemented by January 1, 2025, or the date that any necessary federal approvals have been obtained, whichever date is later.

(c) (1) The Vision Services CHIP-HSI Special Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(2) All revenues derived pursuant to paragraph (1)
 of subdivision (d) and federal financial participation provided for in this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Vision Services CHIP-HSI Special Fund. Moneys in that fund shall be available to cover vision services, as described in subdivision (a), upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act. Commencing with the first fiscal year in which the department requests funds for this purpose and annually thereafter, the department shall report on projected and actual federal and nonfederal resources and expenditures through the budget estimate process.

(d) (1) The department shall seek to fund the implementation of this section, subject to subdivision (c), with funding other than General Fund moneys, including gifts, donations, bequests, or grants of funds from private sources and public agencies, designated for any of the purposes of this section.

(2) This section shall continue to be implemented only if no General Fund moneys are used for this section.

(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this section by means of an all-county letter or similar instruction, without taking any further regulatory action, until regulations are adopted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 487, Sec. 2.   (SB 502)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.6.

External prostheses constructed of silicon or other comparable materials, prosthetic implants, and reconstructive surgery incident to mastectomy shall be deemed medically necessary and shall be covered under this chapter. As used in this section, “mastectomy” means the removal of all or part of the breast for medically necessary reasons, as determined by a licensed physician and surgeon.

Coverage under this section shall include the provision of initial and subsequent prosthetic devices pursuant to an order of the patient’s physician.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1398, Sec. 4.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.62.

(a) Reconstructive surgery shall be covered under this chapter, as defined in subdivision (c), when necessary to achieve the purposes specified in paragraphs (1) or (2) of subdivision (c). Nothing in this section shall be construed to require coverage for cosmetic surgery, as defined in subdivision (d).

(b) No individual, other than a licensed physician competent to evaluate the specific clinical issues involved in the care requested, may deny initial requests for
 authorization of coverage for treatment pursuant to this section. For a treatment authorization request submitted by a podiatrist or an oral and maxillofacial surgeon, the request may be reviewed by a similarly licensed individual competent to evaluate the specific clinical issues involved in the care requested.

(c) “Reconstructive surgery” means surgery performed on abnormal structures of the body caused by congenital defects, developmental abnormalities, trauma, infection, tumors, or disease to do either of the following:

(1) To improve function.

(2) To create a normal appearance, to the extent possible.

(d) “Cosmetic surgery” means surgery that is performed to alter or reshape normal structures of the body in order to improve appearance.

(e) In connection with the interpretation of the definition of reconstructive surgery, a proposed surgical procedure may be subject to prior authorization and utilization review that may include, but need not be limited to, denial under any of the following circumstances:

(1) There is another more appropriate surgical procedure that will be approved for the enrollee.

(2) The procedure or procedures offer only a minimal improvement in the appearance of the enrollee, as defined in regulations adopted by the department.

(3) Denial of payment for procedures performed without prior authorization.

(f) This section shall become operative July 1, 1999.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 788, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Section operative July 1, 1999, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.63.

(a) An orthotist or prosthetist providing services under this chapter shall be required to be certified in orthotics or prosthetics by either the Board for Orthotist Certification or the American Board of Certification in Orthotics and Prosthetics.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until the date that the director executes a declaration, that shall be retained by the director, stating that the department has adopted regulations requiring an
 orthotist or prosthetist to be certified in orthotics or prosthetics by either the Board for Orthotist Certification or the American Board of Certification in Orthotics and Prosthetics, as a condition of providing orthotist or prosthetic services under this chapter, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1009, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Repealed conditionally by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.69.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, donor and recipient organ transplant surgeries are covered under the Medi-Cal program when an organ transplant is provided to a beneficiary who is eligible for full-scope benefits under this chapter in a medical facility that meets the requirements of, and is approved by, the department.

(b) Any donor or recipient organ transplant surgeries authorized by the department pursuant to this chapter are subject to utilization
 controls.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, provider bulletins, or other instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(d) This section shall not apply to Section 14133.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 300, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.70.

(a) A Medi-Cal beneficiary shall remain eligible to receive Medi-Cal coverage for antirejection medication for up to two years following an organ transplant, unless during that period the beneficiary becomes eligible for Medicare or private health insurance that would cover the medication.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 676, Sec. 1.   (AB 2352)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.71.

(a) For purposes of donor and recipient organ transplant surgeries, the department shall establish standards as to both the circumstances and the criteria that the department will use for approving facilities eligible for receiving reimbursement under the Medi-Cal program.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of
 all-county letters, provider bulletins, or other instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 300, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.72.

(a) For purposes of this section, the definitions in subdivision (a) of Section 2290.5 of the Business and Professions Code shall apply.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to recognize the practice of telehealth as a legitimate means by which an individual may receive health care services from a health care provider without in-person
 contact with the provider.

(c) In-person contact between a health care provider and a patient shall not be required under the Medi-Cal program for services appropriately provided through telehealth, subject to reimbursement policies adopted by the department to compensate a licensed health care provider who provides health care services through telehealth that are otherwise reimbursed pursuant to the Medi-Cal program.  Nothing in this section or the Telehealth Advancement Act of 2011 shall be construed to conflict with or supersede the provisions of Section 14091.3 of this code or any other existing state laws or regulations related to reimbursement for services provided by a noncontracted provider.

(d) The department shall not require a health care provider to document a barrier to an in-person visit for Medi-Cal coverage of services provided via telehealth.

(e) For the purposes of payment for covered treatment or services provided through telehealth, the department shall not limit the type of setting where services are provided for the patient or by the health care provider.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to authorize the department to require the use of telehealth when the health care provider has determined that it is not appropriate.

(g) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, and make specific this section by means of all-county letters, provider bulletins, and similar instructions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 547, Sec. 9.   (AB 415)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.723.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, neither face-to-face contact nor a patient’s physical presence on the premises shall be required for services provided by an enrolled community clinic to a Medi-Cal beneficiary during or immediately following a state of emergency, as described in Section 8628.5 of the Government Code.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law,
 the department may apply paragraph (1) to services provided by another enrolled fee-for-service Medi-Cal provider, clinic, or facility during or
 immediately following a state of emergency.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) (A) “Enrolled community clinic” means a community clinic licensed under subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code, an intermittent clinic exempt from licensure under subdivision (h) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, a clinic operated by the state or any of its political subdivisions, including, but not limited to, the University of California or a city or county that is exempt from licensure under subdivision (b) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, a tribal clinic exempt from licensure under subdivision (c) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, or an outpatient setting
 conducted, maintained, or operated by a federally recognized Indian tribe, tribal organization, or urban Indian organization, as defined in Section 1603 of Title 25 of the United States Code, that is certified, as applicable, and enrolled in good standing as a Medi-Cal provider or, in the case of an intermittent site, is added to a parent clinic’s provider master file under Section 14043.15.

(B) An outpatient setting that operates as a federally qualified health center (FQHC) or a rural health center (RHC) shall qualify as an enrolled community clinic, regardless of its license type or license-exempt status.

(2) “Immediately following” means up to 90 calendar
 days, as deemed appropriate by the department, following the termination of the proclaimed state of emergency, as described in Section 8629 of the Government Code. Under extraordinary circumstances, including, but not limited to, the destruction of an enrolled location, as described in subdivision (a), the department may extend, in its discretion or at the direction of the Governor, the period of time immediately following the termination of a state of emergency beyond 90 calendar days and for as long as is necessary for the health and safety of the public.

(3) (A) “Premises” means either of the following, as
 applicable:

(i) A site located within the four walls of the enrolled community clinic, and at the address listed either on the primary care clinic license or in the provider master file.

(ii) A site located within the four walls of the enrolled fee-for-service Medi-Cal provider, clinic, or facility, and at the address listed either on its license or in the provider master file.

(B) For purposes of an FQHC or RHC, “premises” include a site located outside of the four walls of the FQHC or RHC, and at an address other than the address listed on its license or in the provider master file, but within the boundaries of the proclamation declaring the state of emergency.

(4) “Telehealth” has the same meaning as provided in Section 2290.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(5) “Telephonic services” means health services provided via telephone with audio component only.

(c) The following services shall be reimbursable when provided by an enrolled community clinic, an enrolled fee-for-service Medi-Cal program provider, clinic, or facility approved by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) during or immediately following a state of
 emergency for any dates of service on or after the date that the department obtains federal approvals and federal matching funds to implement these provisions pursuant to subdivision (f).

(1) Telehealth services, including services provided by the enrolled community clinic or approved enrolled provider, clinic, or facility at a distant site location, whether on or off the premises, to a Medi-Cal beneficiary located at an originating site, which includes the beneficiary’s home, temporary shelter, or any other location, if the services are provided somewhere located within the boundaries of the proclamation declaring the state of emergency.

(2) Telephonic services.

(3) Covered benefit services that
 are otherwise reimbursable to an FQHC or RHC, but that are provided somewhere off the premises, including, but not limited to, at a temporary shelter, a Medi-Cal beneficiary’s home, or any location other than the premises, but within the boundaries of the proclamation declaring the state of emergency.

(d) For purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), and consistent with Section 14132.72, the department shall ensure its reimbursement policies reflect the intent of the Legislature to authorize reimbursement for telehealth services appropriately provided by an enrolled community clinic, or, if approved by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), by an enrolled fee-for-service Medi-Cal provider, clinic, or facility, respectively, during or immediately following a state of emergency. This subdivision does not
 limit reimbursement for, or coverage of, or reduce access to, services provided through telehealth on or before the enactment of this section.

(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, and make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(f) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that both of the following occur:

(1) The department obtains any federal approvals necessary to implement this section.

(2) The department obtains federal matching funds to the extent permitted by federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 829, Sec. 1.   (AB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.724.

(a) On or before July 1, 2020, the department shall issue, and shall publish on its internet website, guidance for enrolled community clinics and other enrolled fee-for-service Medi-Cal providers, clinics, or facilities that are subject to Section 14132.723 in order to facilitate reimbursement for
 services provided pursuant to Section 14132.723, whether those services are provided at a health facility, a shelter, the Medi-Cal beneficiary’s home, or any other location within the boundaries of the emergency proclamation for the state of emergency, as described in Section 8628.5 of the Government Code. This guidance shall include, at a minimum, all of the following information:

(1) Instructions, including examples, describing how enrolled community clinics and other enrolled fee-for-service Medi-Cal providers, clinics, or facilities submit claims for telehealth or telephonic services, as described in Section 14132.723, to Medi-Cal beneficiaries located outside the premises of the enrolled community clinic or other enrolled fee-for-service Medi-Cal provider, clinic, or facility during or immediately following a state of emergency.

(2) Direction to Medi-Cal managed care plans on paying any claims submitted in accordance with the guidance issued under this section, including that Medi-Cal managed care plans contracting with the department under the Medi-Cal program are responsible for ensuring their delegated payers comply with all applicable federal and state laws, regulations, contract requirements, and any department-issued guidance related to the provision of services by enrolled community clinics or other providers, clinics, or facilities during or immediately following a state of emergency. 

(3) (A) Identification of services, provided during or immediately following a state of emergency, that may be provided solely through a telephonic visit, and identification of services that require
 other forms of telehealth, such as a live, synchronous video interaction, asynchronous store and forward, or an interactive telecommunications system.

(B) Identification of telephonic, facsimile, email, or remote patient monitoring devices that may be used and reimbursed as part of a Medi-Cal covered service, including, but not limited to, laboratory, x-ray, or physician services, subject to any required federal approvals or waivers sought under subdivision (d).

(4) Policies for ensuring prompt payment of claims submitted by enrolled community clinics or other enrolled fee-for-service Medi-Cal providers, clinics, or facilities for services provided during or immediately following a state of emergency, including, but not limited to, the temporary waiver of documentation requirements
 and streamlined billing or appeal processes for commonly owned entities.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Asynchronous store and forward” has the same meaning as provided in Section 2290.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) “Immediately following” has the same meaning as provided in Section 14132.723.

(3) “Interactive telecommunications system” has
 the same
 meaning as provided in Section 410.78 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(4) “Premises” has the same meaning as provided in Section 14132.723.

(5) “Telehealth” has the same meaning as provided in Section 2290.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(c) The department shall seek federal approval of any necessary state plan amendments or waivers to implement this section, including, but not limited to, any demonstration program or similar opportunities
 allowing a telephonic visit to be used as a substitute for other forms of telehealth, such as synchronous video interaction, asynchronous store and forward, or an interactive telecommunications system.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action. The department shall adopt regulations by January 1, 2024, in accordance
 with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 829, Sec. 2.   (AB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.725.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Border community” means border areas adjacent to the State of California where it is customary practice for California residents to use medical resources in adjacent areas outside the state. Under these circumstances, program controls and limitations are the same as for services rendered by health care providers within the state.

(2) “Health care provider” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 2290.5 of the Business and Professions Code, and shall be either enrolled as a Medi-Cal rendering provider, or a
 nonphysician medical practitioner affiliated with an enrolled Medi-Cal provider group. “Health care provider” also includes any provider type designated by the department pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). The enrolled Medi-Cal provider or provider group for which the health care provider renders services via telehealth shall meet all Medi-Cal requirements and shall be located in the state or a border community.

(3) “Health care service plan” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 1345 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (j) of Section 14184.101.

(5) “Network provider” has the same meaning as
 set forth in Section 438.2 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(6) “Telehealth” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 2290.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) (1) Subject to subdivision (k), in-person, face-to-face contact between a health care provider and a patient is not required under the Medi-Cal program for covered health care services and provider types designated by the department, when provided by video synchronous interaction, asynchronous store and forward, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 2290.5 of the Business and Professions Code, audio-only synchronous interaction, remote patient monitoring, or other permissible virtual communication modalities, when those services and
 settings meet the applicable standard of care and meet the requirements of the service code being billed.

(2) (A) In implementing this section, the department shall designate and periodically update the covered health care services and provider types, including required licensing and credentialing criteria, as applicable, which may be appropriately delivered via the telehealth modalities described in this subdivision.
